browser/locales/l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX q+ Y 36
SFX q+ enir enu/L'D'Q' enir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ enir enus/D'Q' enir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ enir enue/L'D'Q' enir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ enir enues/D'Q' enir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ tir ti/L'D'Q' tir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ tir tis/D'Q' tir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ tir tie/L'D'Q' tir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ tir ties/D'Q' tir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ courir couru/L'D'Q' courir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ courir courus/D'Q' courir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ courir courue/L'D'Q' courir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ courir courues/D'Q' courir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ ivre écu/L'D'Q' vivre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ ivre écus/D'Q' vivre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ ivre écue/L'D'Q' vivre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ ivre écues/D'Q' vivre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ aire u/L'D'Q' aire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ aire us/D'Q' aire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ aire ue/L'D'Q' aire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ aire ues/D'Q' aire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ dre du/L'D'Q' dre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ dre dus/D'Q' dre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ dre due/L'D'Q' dre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ dre dues/D'Q' dre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ valoir valu/L'D'Q' .valoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ valoir valus/D'Q' .valoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ valoir value/L'D'Q' .valoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ valoir values/D'Q' .valoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ aître u/L'D'Q' aître po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ aître us/D'Q' aître po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ aître ue/L'D'Q' aître po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ aître ues/D'Q' aître po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ aitre u/L'D'Q' aitre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ aitre us/D'Q' aitre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ aitre ue/L'D'Q' aitre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ aitre ues/D'Q' aitre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl

SFX q. Y 9
SFX q. enir enu/d'q' enir po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. tir ti/d'q' tir po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. courir couru/d'q' courir po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. ivre écu/d'q' vivre po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aire u/d'q' aire po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. dre du/d'q' dre po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. valoir valu/d'q' .valoir po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aître u/d'q' aître po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aitre u/d'q' aitre po:ppas is:epi is:inv
